Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3598.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The courthouse of the Dorchester division of the Boston municipal court located at 510
Washington street in the city of Boston shall be designated and known as the Judge Leslie E.
Harris courthouse, in honor of the late Honorable Leslie Earl Harris, a former judge of the
Suffolk juvenile court, for his many contributions to his community, the judiciary and the
commonwealth. The division of capital asset management and maintenance shall erect and
maintain suitable markers bearing the designation in compliance with any applicable standards.
of 1